Utah statutes.
10-3-610.   Requiring attendance of witnesses, production of evidence.

The governing body of each municipality may require the attendance of any person to give testimony or produce records, documents or things for inspection, copying or examination necessary or useful for the governance of the municipality. The governing body may by ordinance establish its own procedures for issuing subpoenas to require attendance and production under this section or it may issue subpoenas in its own name in the same manner as is provided in the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.

